Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.020

Notice of hearing—Settlement of report.

It shall not be necessary for the personal representative to give any notice of the hearing of any report prior to the final report, except as in RCW 11.28.240 provided, but the court may require notice of the hearing of any such report.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.76.020. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 160; RRS s 1530.]